California, session 20252026, SB1254.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65300 of the Government Code is amended to read:65300. Each planning agency shall prepare prepare, and the legislative body of each county and city shall adopt adopt, a comprehensive, long-term general plan for the physical development of the county or city, and of any land outside its boundaries which that in the planning agency’s judgment bears relation to its planning. Chartered cities shall adopt general plans which that contain the mandatory elements specified in Section 65302.